Tennessee, session 114, SB1188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-938(c)(3), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(E) Any other medal authorized by congress for the armed forces of the United
States that is awarded to a member of the armed forces for combat or heroism;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-938(c), is amended by deleting
subdivisions (5) and (6) and substituting instead the following:
(5) Be admitted to, and enrolled in, an eligible program of study at an eligible
postsecondary institution seeking a certificate or associate or baccalaureate degree;
(6) Have not received a certificate or baccalaureate degree; and
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2025-2026 academic year and each academic year thereafter.
SB1188
002783
- 1 -